Ohio, session 136, HB44.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That sections 109.804, 124.11, and 124.30 be amended and sections 109.791 and
ECTION
737.061 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows:
Sec. 109.791. The Ohio peace officer training commission may establish and conduct police
officer training courses in addition to those specified in section 109.79 of the Revised Code to be
offered to a law enforcement officer at or above the rank of sergeant.
Sec. 109.804. (A)(1) The Ohio peace officer training commission shall develop and conduct
provide a chief of police training course lasting forty hours for newly appointed chiefs of police
appointed on or after January 1, 2018. The commission shall determine the course topics, which
shall include diversity training with an emphasis on historical perspectives and community-police
relations, and shall establish criteria for what constitutes successful completion of the course. The
commission shall conduct the course at the Ohio peace officer training academy locations
determined by the commission and in a manner prescribed by the commission. The commission
shall offer the course at least semiannually.
(2) The executive director of the commission shall issue a certificate of completion of a
training program required under this section in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code
to a newly appointed chief of police if either of the following applies:
(a) The person holds a certificate of completion of such a program in another state.
(b) The person has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private
certification as described in that chapter as a chief of police in a state that does not require
completion of such a training program.
(B) A newly appointed chief of police may request an equivalency exemption from a portion
eight hours of the forty hours of the chief of police training course, on topics approved by the
executive director, by submitting to the Ohio peace officer training commission, not more than ten
calendar days following the person's appointment as a chief of police, evidence of training or
qualification in the subject area of the exempted portiontopics.
A request for equivalency exemption by the newly appointed chief of police shall be

Sub. H. B. No. 44 136th G.A.
2
provided to the commission not later than fourteen calendar days before the beginning of the course.
(C) Upon presentation of evidence by a newly appointed chief of police that because of a
medical disability or other good cause the newly appointed chief of police is unable to complete the
chief of police training course, the Ohio peace officer training commission may defer the
requirement for the newly appointed chief of police to complete the chief of police training course
until the disability or cause terminates.
(D) A newly appointed chief of police appointed on or after January 1, 2018, shall attend a
chief of police training course conducted by the Ohio peace officer training commission pursuant to
division (A) of this section not later than six months after the person's appointment as a chief of
police. While attending the chief of police training course, a newly appointed chief of police shall
receive compensation in the same manner and amounts as if carrying out the powers and duties of
the office of chief of police. The costs of conducting the chief of police training course shall be paid
from state funds appropriated to the attorney general. The cost of meals, lodging, and travel of a
newly appointed chief of police attending the chief of police training course shall be paid from the
budget of the entity for which the newly appointed chief of police was appointed.
(E) As used in this section:
"Newly appointed chief of police" means a person appointed chief of police under section
505.49, 737.05, or 737.15 of the Revised Code or any administrative official that is responsible for
the daily administration and supervision of peace officers in a law enforcement agency who did not
hold the office has never held the full-time position of chief of police on the date before the person
was appointed chief of police.
"Law enforcement agency" means a municipal or township police department, or any other
entity authorized by statute to appoint peace officers to enforce criminal laws and who have the
statutory power of arrest. "Law enforcement agency" does not include a county sheriff’s office, the
state highway patrol, or the bureau of criminal identification and investigation.
Sec. 124.11. The civil service of the state and the several counties, cities, civil service
townships, city health districts, general health districts, and city school districts of the state shall be
divided into the unclassified service and the classified service.
(A) The unclassified service shall comprise the following positions, which shall not be
included in the classified service, and which shall be exempt from all examinations required by this
chapter:
(1) All officers elected by popular vote or persons appointed to fill vacancies in those
offices;
(2) All election officers as defined in section 3501.01 of the Revised Code;
(3)(a) The members of all boards and commissions, and heads of principal departments,
boards, and commissions appointed by the governor or by and with the governor's consent;
(b) The heads of all departments appointed by a board of county commissioners;
(c) The members of all boards and commissions and all heads of departments appointed by

Sub. H. B. No. 44 136th G.A.
3
the mayor, or, if there is no mayor, such other similar chief appointing authority of any city or city
school district;
Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(17) or (C) of this section, this chapter does not
exempt the chiefs of police departments and chiefs of fire departments of cities or civil service
townships from the competitive classified service.
(4) The members of county or district licensing boards or commissions and boards of
revision, and not more than five deputy county auditors;
(5) All officers and employees elected or appointed by either or both branches of the general
assembly, and employees of the city legislative authority engaged in legislative duties;
(6) All commissioned, warrant, and noncommissioned officers and enlisted persons in the
Ohio organized militia, including military appointees in the adjutant general's department;
(7)(a) All presidents, business managers, administrative officers, superintendents, assistant
superintendents, principals, deans, assistant deans, instructors, teachers, and such employees as are
engaged in educational or research duties connected with the public school system, colleges, and
universities, as determined by the governing body of the public school system, colleges, and
universities;
(b) The library staff of any library in the state supported wholly or in part at public expense.
(8) Four clerical and administrative support employees for each of the elective state officers,
four clerical and administrative support employees for each board of county commissioners and one
such employee for each county commissioner, and four clerical and administrative support
employees for other elective officers and each of the principal appointive executive officers, boards,
or commissions, except for civil service commissions, that are authorized to appoint such clerical
and administrative support employees;
(9) The deputies and assistants of state agencies authorized to act for and on behalf of the
agency, or holding a fiduciary or administrative relation to that agency and those persons employed
by and directly responsible to elected county officials or a county administrator and holding a
fiduciary or administrative relationship to such elected county officials or county administrator, and
the employees of such county officials whose fitness would be impracticable to determine by
competitive examination, provided that division (A)(9) of this section shall not affect those persons
in county employment in the classified service as of September 19, 1961. Nothing in division (A)(9)
of this section applies to any position in a county department of job and family services created
pursuant to Chapter 329. of the Revised Code.
(10) Bailiffs, constables, official stenographers, and commissioners of courts of record,
deputies of clerks of the courts of common pleas who supervise or who handle public moneys or
secured documents, and such officers and employees of courts of record and such deputies of clerks
of the courts of common pleas as the appointing authority finds it impracticable to determine their
fitness by competitive examination;
(11) Assistants to the attorney general, special counsel appointed or employed by the

Sub. H. B. No. 44 136th G.A.
4
attorney general, assistants to county prosecuting attorneys, and assistants to city directors of law;
(12) Such teachers and employees in the agricultural experiment stations; such students in
normal schools, colleges, and universities of the state who are employed by the state or a political
subdivision of the state in student or intern classifications; and such unskilled labor positions as the
director of administrative services, with respect to positions in the service of the state, or any
municipal civil service commission may find it impracticable to include in the competitive classified
service; provided such exemptions shall be by order of the commission or the director, duly entered
on the record of the commission or the director with the reasons for each such exemption;
(13) Any physician or dentist who is a full-time employee of the department of mental health
and addiction services, the department of developmental disabilities, or an institution under the
jurisdiction of either department; and physicians who are in residency programs at the institutions;
(14) Up to twenty positions at each institution under the jurisdiction of the department of
mental health and addiction services or the department of developmental disabilities that the
department director determines to be primarily administrative or managerial; and up to fifteen
positions in any division of either department, excluding administrative assistants to the director and
division chiefs, which are within the immediate staff of a division chief and which the director
determines to be primarily and distinctively administrative and managerial;
(15) Noncitizens of the United States employed by the state, or its counties or cities, as
physicians or nurses who are duly licensed to practice their respective professions under the laws of
this state, or medical assistants, in mental or chronic disease hospitals, or institutions;
(16) Employees of the governor's office;
(17) Fire chiefs and chiefs of police in civil service townships appointed by boards of
township trustees under section 505.38 or 505.49 of the Revised Code;
(18) Executive directors, deputy directors, and program directors employed by boards of
alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services under Chapter 340. of the Revised Code, and
secretaries of the executive directors, deputy directors, and program directors;
(19) Superintendents, and management employees as defined in section 5126.20 of the
Revised Code, of county boards of developmental disabilities;
(20) Physicians, nurses, and other employees of a county hospital who are appointed
pursuant to sections 339.03 and 339.06 of the Revised Code;
(21) The executive director of the state medical board, who is appointed pursuant to division
(B) of section 4731.05 of the Revised Code;
(22) County directors of job and family services as provided in section 329.02 of the Revised
Code and administrators appointed under section 329.021 of the Revised Code;
(23) A director of economic development who is hired pursuant to division (A) of section
307.07 of the Revised Code;
(24) Chiefs of construction and compliance, of operations and maintenance, of worker
protection, and of licensing and certification in the division of industrial compliance in the

Sub. H. B. No. 44 136th G.A.
5
department of commerce;
(25) The executive director of a county transit system appointed under division (A) of
section 306.04 of the Revised Code;
(26) Up to five positions at each of the administrative departments listed in section 121.02 of
the Revised Code and at the department of taxation, department of the adjutant general, department
of education, Ohio board of regents, bureau of workers' compensation, industrial commission, state
lottery commission, opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency, and public utilities
commission of Ohio that the head of that administrative department or of that other state agency
determines to be involved in policy development and implementation. The head of the
administrative department or other state agency shall set the compensation for employees in these
positions at a rate that is not less than the minimum compensation specified in pay range 41 but not
more than the maximum compensation specified in pay range 47 of salary schedule E-2 in section
124.152 of the Revised Code. The authority to establish positions in the unclassified service under
division (A)(26) of this section is in addition to and does not limit any other authority that an
administrative department or state agency has under the Revised Code to establish positions, appoint
employees, or set compensation.
(27) Employees of the department of agriculture employed under section 901.09 of the
Revised Code;
(28) For cities, counties, civil service townships, city health districts, general health districts,
and city school districts, the deputies and assistants of elective or principal executive officers
authorized to act for and in the place of their principals or holding a fiduciary relation to their
principals;
(29) Employees who receive intermittent or temporary appointments under division (B) (C)
of section 124.30 of the Revised Code;
(30) Employees appointed to administrative staff positions for which an appointing authority
is given specific statutory authority to set compensation;
(31) Employees appointed to highway patrol cadet or highway patrol cadet candidate
classifications;
(32) Employees appointed to participate in a prospective law enforcement training school
under section 737.061 of the Revised Code;
(33) Employees placed in the unclassified service by another section of the Revised Code.
(B) The classified service shall comprise all persons in the employ of the state and the
several counties, cities, city health districts, general health districts, and city school districts of the
state, not specifically included in the unclassified service. Upon the creation by the board of trustees
of a civil service township civil service commission, the classified service shall also comprise,
except as otherwise provided in division (A)(17) or (C) of this section, all persons in the employ of a
civil service township police or fire department having ten or more full-time paid employees. The
classified service consists of two classes, which shall be designated as the competitive class and the

Sub. H. B. No. 44 136th G.A.
6
unskilled labor class.
(1) The competitive class shall include all positions and employments in the state and the
counties, cities, city health districts, general health districts, and city school districts of the state, and,
upon the creation by the board of trustees of a civil service township of a township civil service
commission, all positions in a civil service township police or fire department having ten or more
full-time paid employees, for which it is practicable to determine the merit and fitness of applicants
by competitive examinations. Appointments shall be made to, or employment shall be given in, all
positions in the competitive class that are not filled by promotion, reinstatement, transfer, or
reduction, as provided in this chapter, and the rules of the director of administrative services, by
appointment from those certified to the appointing officer in accordance with this chapter.
(2) The unskilled labor class shall include ordinary unskilled laborers. Vacancies in the labor
class for positions in service of the state shall be filled by appointment from lists of applicants
registered by the director or the director's designee. Vacancies in the labor class for all other
positions shall be filled by appointment from lists of applicants registered by a commission. The
director or the commission, as applicable, by rule, shall require an applicant for registration in the
labor class to furnish evidence or take tests as the director or commission considers proper with
respect to age, residence, physical condition, ability to labor, honesty, sobriety, industry, capacity,
and experience in the work or employment for which application is made. Laborers who fulfill the
requirements shall be placed on the eligible list for the kind of labor or employment sought, and
preference shall be given in employment in accordance with the rating received from that evidence
or in those tests. Upon the request of an appointing officer, stating the kind of labor needed, the pay
and probable length of employment, and the number to be employed, the director or commission, as
applicable, shall certify from the highest on the list double the number to be employed; from this
number, the appointing officer shall appoint the number actually needed for the particular work. If
more than one applicant receives the same rating, priority in time of application shall determine the
order in which their names shall be certified for appointment.
(C) A municipal or civil service township civil service commission may place volunteer
firefighters who are paid on a fee-for-service basis in either the classified or the unclassified civil
service.
(D)(1) This division does not apply to persons in the unclassified service who have the right
to resume positions in the classified service under sections 4121.121, 5119.18, 5120.38, 5120.381,
5120.382, 5123.08, and 5139.02 of the Revised Code or to cities, counties, or political subdivisions
of the state.
(2) A person who holds a position in the classified service of the state and who is appointed
to a position in the unclassified service shall retain the right to resume the position and status held by
the person in the classified service immediately prior to the person's appointment to the position in
the unclassified service, regardless of the number of positions the person held in the unclassified
service. An employee's right to resume a position in the classified service may only be exercised

Sub. H. B. No. 44 136th G.A.
7
when an appointing authority demotes the employee to a pay range lower than the employee's
current pay range or revokes the employee's appointment to the unclassified service and any of the
following apply:
(a) That person held a certified position prior to July 1, 2007, in the classified service within
the appointing authority's agency;
(b) That person held a permanent position on or after July 1, 2007, in the classified service
within the appointing authority's agency, and was appointed to the position in the unclassified
service prior to January 1, 2016;
(c) That person held a permanent position on or after January 1, 2016, in the classified
service within the appointing authority's agency, and is within five years from the effective date of
the person's appointment in the unclassified service.
(3) An employee forfeits the right to resume a position in the classified service when:
(a) The employee is removed from the position in the unclassified service due to
incompetence, inefficiency, dishonesty, drunkenness, immoral conduct, insubordination,
discourteous treatment of the public, neglect of duty, violation of this chapter or the rules of the
director of administrative services, any other failure of good behavior, any other acts of misfeasance,
malfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or conviction of a felony while employed in the civil service;
or
(b) Upon transfer to a different agency.
(4) Reinstatement to a position in the classified service shall be to a position substantially
equal to that position in the classified service held previously, as certified by the director of
administrative services. If the position the person previously held in the classified service has been
placed in the unclassified service or is otherwise unavailable, the person shall be appointed to a
position in the classified service within the appointing authority's agency that the director of
administrative services certifies is comparable in compensation to the position the person previously
held in the classified service. Service in the position in the unclassified service shall be counted as
service in the position in the classified service held by the person immediately prior to the person's
appointment to the position in the unclassified service. When a person is reinstated to a position in
the classified service as provided in this division, the person is entitled to all rights, status, and
benefits accruing to the position in the classified service during the person's time of service in the
position in the unclassified service.
Sec. 124.30. (A) Classified positions in the civil service may be filled without competition as
follows:
(1) Whenever there are urgent reasons for filling a vacancy in any position in the classified
civil service and the director of administrative services is unable to certify to the appointing
authority, upon its request, a list of persons eligible for appointment to the position after a
competitive examination, the appointing authority may fill the position by noncompetitive
examination.

Sub. H. B. No. 44 136th G.A.
8
A temporary appointment may be made without regard to the rules of sections 124.01 to
124.64 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the temporary
appointment may not continue longer than one hundred twenty days, and in no case shall successive
temporary appointments be made. A temporary appointment longer than one hundred twenty days
may be made if necessary by reason of sickness, disability, or other approved leave of absence of
regular officers or employees, in which case it may continue during the period of sickness, disability,
or other approved leave of absence, subject to the rules of the director.
(2) In case of a vacancy in a position in the classified civil service where peculiar and
exceptional qualifications of a scientific, managerial, professional, or educational character are
required, and upon satisfactory evidence that for specified reasons competition in this special case is
impracticable and that the position can best be filled by a selection of some designated person of
high and recognized attainments in those qualities, the director may suspend the provisions of
sections 124.01 to 124.64 of the Revised Code that require competition in this special case, but no
suspension shall be general in its application. All such cases of suspension shall be reported in the
annual report of the director with the reasons for each suspension. The director shall suspend the
provisions when either of the following applies:
(a) The director of job and family services provides the certification under section 5101.051
of the Revised Code that a position with the department of job and family services can best be filled
if the provisions are suspended;
(b) The medicaid director provides the certification under section 5160.051 of the Revised
Code that a position with the department of medicaid can best be filled if the provisions are
suspended.
(3) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, in case of a vacancy in a position in
the classified civil service in a police department, on satisfactory evidence that for specified reasons
competition in this special case is impracticable and that the position can best be filled by a selection
of some designated person holding a specialized certification, possessing peculiar and exceptional
qualifications, or having completed a police cadet training program through the police department,
the director of administrative services may suspend the provisions of sections 124.01 to 124.64 of
the Revised Code that require competition in this special case, but no suspension shall be general in
its application.
(B) The acceptance or refusal by an eligible person of a temporary appointment under
division (A)(1) of this section shall not affect the person's standing on the eligible list for permanent
appointment, nor shall the period of temporary service be counted as a part of the probationary
service in case of subsequent appointment to a permanent position.
(B) (C) Persons who receive temporary or intermittent appointments under division (A)(1) of
this section are in the unclassified civil service and serve at the pleasure of their appointing
authority.
(D) Division (A)(3) of this section does not apply to a vacancy in a position in the classified

Sub. H. B. No. 44 136th G.A.
9
civil service in a police department that must be filled by promotion as prescribed in section 124.44
of the Revised Code.
Sec. 737.061. (A) The chief of police of a municipal corporation may conduct training
schools for prospective law enforcement officers. The training school programs shall align with
Ohio peace officer training academy standards and cadet qualifications. The prospective officers,
during the period of training and as members of the training school, may be paid a reasonable salary.
The chief of police may furnish the necessary supplies and equipment for the use of the prospective
officers during the training period.
(B) The chief of police may establish rules governing the qualifications for admission to
training schools for prospective officers and provide for competitive examinations to determine the
fitness of the students and prospective officers, not inconsistent with the rules of the director of
administrative services.
(C) Upon completion of a training school program established under this section, a program
graduate may be hired directly by the relevant department, provided the graduate also satisfies the
requirements for original appointment under section 109.77 of the Revised Code.
S 2. That existing sections 109.804, 124.11, and 124.30 of the Revised Code are
ECTION
hereby repealed.

Sub. H. B. No. 44 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

Sub. H. B. No. 44 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________